Illinois, session 104th, SB29.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Notice By Publication Act is amended by 5changing Sections 3.1 and 5 and by adding Section 2.2 as 6follows: 7    (715 ILCS 5/2.2 new)8    Sec. 2.2. Municipal electronic publication.9    (a) Whenever a municipality is required to provide notice 10by publication in a newspaper by law, order of court, or 11contract, the municipality may publish the notice on an 12official municipal website instead of in a newspaper if the 13notice published on the official municipal website is also 14published electronically on a searchable online database 15website and that website provides independent certification of 16the publication.17    (b) The municipality or the host of the website may enter 18into a service-level agreement with an Internet service 19provider that guarantees the site is accessible to the public 20over the Internet at least 98% of the time, 24 hours a day, 365 21days a year.22    (c) The official municipal website shall display a link to 23the searchable online database website, which shall contain a   SB0029- 2 -LRB104 03021 LNS 13039 b1list of all current legal notices of the municipality, with 2links to or the full text of those notices. The website shall 3contain a search function or other features that improve 4public accessibility to the notices.5    (d) Whenever an individual is unable to access an 6electronic publication of a notice, the issuing municipality 7shall provide a copy of the notice to the individual free of 8charge at the principal office of the municipality.9    (e) Notices shall remain available on the website at least 10until the last posting date required by law has expired or 11until the event described in a notice has taken place, 12whichever is later.13    (f) Independent certification of the electronic 14publication shall include a certificate stating the title of 15the notice, the exact day, date, and time of the notice's 16publication, the website address of the searchable online 17database where the notice and archived notices may be accessed 18by the public, and other information as may be available. 19    (g) For purposes of this Section, a searchable online 20database website may be operated or managed by a statewide 21organization of municipalities as authorized by Section 1-8-1 22of the Illinois Municipal Code at no additional cost to the 23municipality to publish notices thereon.  24    (715 ILCS 5/3.1)  (from Ch. 100, par. 3.1)25    Sec. 3.1. When any notice is required by law, or order of   SB0029- 3 -LRB104 03021 LNS 13039 b1court, to be published in any newspaper, publication of such 2notice shall include the printing of such notice in the total 3circulation of each edition on the date of publication of the 4newspaper in which the notice is published; and the newspaper 5publishing the notice shall, at no additional cost to 6government, cause the notice to be placed on the statewide 7website established and maintained as a joint venture of the 8majority of Illinois newspapers as a repository for such 9notices. All notices required for publication by this Act 10shall remain legal and valid for all purposes when any error 11that occurs pursuant to the requirements of this Section for 12placement of the notice on the statewide website is the fault 13of the printer.14(Source: P.A. 100-72, eff. 1-1-18.) 15    (715 ILCS 5/5)  (from Ch. 100, par. 5)16    Sec. 5. When any notice is required by law or contract to 17be published only in a newspaper (unless otherwise expressly 18provided in the contract), it shall be intended to be in a 19secular newspaper of general circulation, published in the 20city, town, or county, or some newspaper specially authorized 21by law to publish legal notices, in the city, town, or county. 22If there is no newspaper published in the county in which the 23city or town is located, notice shall be given in a secular 24newspaper, as defined in this Act, that is published in an 25adjoining county having general circulation within the city or   SB0029- 4 -LRB104 03021 LNS 13039 b1town. Unless otherwise expressly provided in the contract, the 2term "newspaper" means a newspaper: 3    (a) which consists of not less than 4 pages of printed 4matter and contains at least 100 square inches of printed 5matter per page; and6    (b) which is printed through the use of one of the 7conventional and generally recognized printing processes such 8as letterpress, lithography, or gravure; and9    (c) which annually averages at least 25% news content per 10issue; or which annually averages at least 1,000 column inches 11of news content per issue, the term "news content" meaning for 12the purposes of this Act any printed matter other than 13advertising; and14    (d) which publishes miscellaneous reading matter, legal or 15other announcements and notices, and news and information 16concerning current happenings and passing events of a 17political, social, religious, commercial, financial, or legal 18nature, and advertisements or bulletins; and19    (e) which has been continuously published at regular 20intervals of at least once each week with a minimum of 50 21issues per year, for at least one year prior to the first 22publication of the notice; or which is a successor to a 23newspaper as herein defined with no interruption of 24publication of more than 30 days; or which is a merged or 25consolidated newspaper formed by the merger or consolidation 26of 2 two or more newspapers, one of which has been continuously   SB0029- 5 -LRB104 03021 LNS 13039 b1published at regular intervals of at least once each week with 2a minimum of 50 issues per year, for at least one year prior to 3the first publication of the notice. A newspaper shall be 4considered as continuously or regularly published although its 5publication has been suspended, where such suspension was 6caused by fire or an Act of God or by a labor dispute or by its 7owner, publisher, managing editor, or other essential employee 8entering the active military service of the United States, if 9the newspaper was continuously or regularly published for at 10least one year prior to its suspension and if its publication 11is resumed at any time not later than 12 months after such fire 12or Act of God, or if its publication is resumed at any time 13within 12 months after the termination of the labor dispute, 14or if its publication is resumed at any time within 12 months 15after the termination of the war in connection with which such 16persons entered such military service; and17    (f) (blank). which has the capability of placing notices 18required pursuant to this Act on a daily or weekly basis on the 19statewide website as required by Section 2.1. 20(Source: P.A. 96-59, eff. 7-23-09; 96-1144, eff. 12-31-12.) 21    (715 ILCS 5/2.1 rep.)22    Section 10. The Notice By Publication Act is amended by 23repealing Section 2.1. 24    Section 15. The Newspaper Legal Notice Act is amended by   SB0029- 6 -LRB104 03021 LNS 13039 b1changing Sections 1 and 2 as follows: 2    (715 ILCS 10/1)  (from Ch. 100, par. 10)3    Sec. 1. Whenever it is required by law that any legal 4notice or publication shall be published only in a newspaper 5in this State, it shall be held to mean a newspaper: 6    (a) which consists of not less than 4 pages of printed 7matter and contains at least 100 square inches of printed 8matter per page; and9    (b) which is printed through the use of one of the 10conventional and generally recognized printing processes such 11as letterpress, lithography, or gravure; and12    (c) which annually averages at least 25% news content per 13issue; or which annually averages at least 1,000 column inches 14of news content per issue, the term "news content" meaning for 15the purposes of this Act any printed matter other than 16advertising; and17    (d) which publishes miscellaneous reading matter, legal or 18other announcements and notices, and news and information 19concerning current happenings and passing events of a 20political, social, religious, commercial, financial, or legal 21nature, and advertisements or bulletins; and22    (e) which has been continuously published at regular 23intervals of at least once each week with a minimum of 50 24issues per year, for at least one year prior to the first 25publication of the notice; or which is a successor to a   SB0029- 7 -LRB104 03021 LNS 13039 b1newspaper as herein defined with no interruption of 2publication of more than 30 days; or which is a merged or 3consolidated newspaper formed by the merger or consolidation 4of 2 two or more newspapers, one of which has been continuously 5published at regular intervals of at least once each week with 6a minimum of 50 issues per year for at least one year prior to 7the first publication of the notice. A newspaper shall be 8considered as continuously or regularly published although its 9publication has been suspended, where such suspension was 10caused by fire or an Act of God or by a labor dispute or by its 11owner, publisher, managing editor, or other essential employee 12entering the active military service of the United States, if 13the newspaper was continuously or regularly published for at 14least one year prior to its suspension and if its publication 15is resumed at any time not later than 12 months after such fire 16or Act of God, or if its publication is resumed at any time 17within 12 months after the termination of the labor dispute, 18or if its publication is resumed at any time within 12 months 19after the termination of the war in connection with which such 20persons entered such military service; and21    (f) (blank). which has the capability of placing, at no 22additional cost to government, notices required pursuant to 23this Act on a daily or weekly basis on the statewide website 24established and maintained as a joint venture by the majority 25of Illinois newspapers as a repository for such notices. 26(Source: P.A. 96-59, eff. 7-23-09; 96-1144, eff. 12-31-12.)   SB0029- 8 -LRB104 03021 LNS 13039 b1    (715 ILCS 10/2)  (from Ch. 100, par. 10.1)2    Sec. 2. When any legal notice is required by law to be 3published in any newspaper, such notice shall include the 4printing of such notice in the total circulation of each 5edition on the date of publication of the newspaper in which 6the notice is published; and the newspaper publishing the 7notice shall, at no additional cost to government, cause the 8notice to be placed on the statewide website established and 9maintained as a joint venture of the majority of Illinois 10newspapers as a repository for such notices. All notices 11required for publication by this Act shall remain legal and 12valid for all purposes when any error that occurs pursuant to 13the requirements of this Section in the requirement for 14placement of the notice on the statewide website is the fault 15of the printer.16(Source: P.A. 100-72, eff. 1-1-18.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.